Nevada, session 83, SB334.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. Chapter 209 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
On or before March 1 of each year, the Director shall submit a
report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Senate Standing Committee on Finance and the
Assembly Standing Committee on Ways and Means during a
regular or special session of the Legislature, or the Interim
Finance Committee when the Legislature is not in session,
relating to the employment of offenders that includes, without
limitation, the following information relating to the previous year:
1. The number of offenders who were eligible for
employment;
2. The number of offenders who were employed;
3. The number of offenders who refused employment;
4. The pay of the offenders who were employed;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
5. The educational attainments of the offenders who were
employed, including, without limitation:
(a) The number of such offenders who successfully completed
a program of general education, a vocational education and
training program or any other educational program approved by
the Director; and
(b) Any certificates, diplomas, degrees or other credentials
earned in connection with such programs;
6. The amount of the deductions from the accounts of
offenders who were employed; and
7. Of the offenders who were employed and who were
subsequently released, the percentage of offenders who found
employment following release with the industries in which they
were employed.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)